Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1822
Death during apprehension or custody; county coroner; duties.

In each instance when the county coroner is given notice in accordance with section 23-1821, the coroner or coroner's physician shall perform an examination, a test, or an autopsy as he or she may deem necessary to establish, by a reasonable degree of medical certainty, the cause or causes of death and shall thereafter certify the cause or causes of death to the presiding judge of the district court.

Laws 1988, LB 676, § 2.